Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4813
Administrator; farm mediation service; promote services.

The administrator and the farm mediation service shall make an extensive effort to educate borrowers and creditors and other eligible participants on the mediation process; financial, legal, and federal agricultural program issues; and the availability of farm mediation services.

Laws 1988, LB 664, § 13;

Laws 1997, LB 200, § 7.